Missouri, session 2026, SB1039.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 435.014, RSMo, is repealed and five
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
435.300, 435.303, 435.306, 435.309, and 435.312, to read as
follows:
435.300. As used in sections 435.300 to 435.312, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Alternative dispute resolution communication", a
statement, whether communicated orally, in writing, or by
nonverbal conduct, that is either:
(a) Related to the subject matter of the dispute and
made during an alternative dispute resolution process; or
(b) Made as part of considering, conducting,
participating in, initiating, continuing, or reconvening an
alternative dispute resolution process.
The term "alternative dispute resolution communication"
shall not include the notifications or reports made pursuant
to subsection 2 of section 435.303 or subsection 8 of
section 435.306 or a written agreement as described in
section 435.312;
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1039 2
(2) "Alternative dispute resolution process",
mediation, arbitration, or early neutral evaluation used in
conjunction with a pending civil action, and any other
alternative to trial that has been included in a local court
rule applicable to a civil dispute;
(3) "Arbitration", a procedure in which a neutral or
panel of neutrals hears and decides a dispute between two or
more parties;
(4) "Conflict of interest", any direct or indirect
financial or personal interest in the outcome of a dispute
or any existing or prior financial, business, professional,
familial, or social relationship with any participant in an
alternative dispute resolution process that is likely to
affect the impartiality of the neutral or that may
reasonably create an appearance of partiality or bias;
(5) "Early neutral evaluation", a process in which a
neutral provides parties to a dispute with a nonbinding
assessment of their dispute;
(6) "In camera", a proceeding held in a judge's
chambers or in a courtroom from which the public is excluded;
(7) "Mandated reporter", an individual who is required
to report abuse or neglect pursuant to the provisions of
section 192.2405, 192.2475, 198.070, 208.912, 210.115,
352.400, 630.162, or 630.165;
(8) "Mediation", a process in which a neutral
facilitates communications among the parties and assists the
parties in their efforts to reach a voluntary agreement
regarding the dispute;
(9) "Mediator", a neutral who conducts mediation;
(10) "Neutral", an individual who, acting
independently and not as a representative, agent, or
advocate of any of the parties, assists the parties in their

SB 1039 3
efforts to reach a resolution of their dispute through an
alternative dispute resolution process;
(11) "Participant", any person or entity, including
any neutral or party, who participates in an alternative
dispute resolution process;
(12) "Party", an individual or entity named as a party
in a pending civil action, or in an agreement to use an
alternative dispute resolution process as described in
sections 435.309 and 435.312;
(13) "Person", an individual; a public or private
corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership,
limited liability company, or insurance company; an
association; a joint venture; a governmental unit,
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality of the state; or any
other legal or commercial entity;
(14) "Proceeding", a judicial, administrative,
arbitral, or other adjudicative process, including related
prehearing and posthearing motions, conferences, hearings,
and discovery;
(15) "Writing" or "written", a tangible or electronic
record of a communication or representation, including
handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating,
photography, audio or video recording, and electronic
communication;
(16) "Written agreement", a writing that:
(a) Contains the essential terms of an agreement; and
(b) Is signed, executed, or adopted by the parties, by
any process described in subdivision (15) of this section,
including electronic signatures as permitted by section
432.230, with the intent to sign and be bound by the
writing, and attached to or logically associated with the
writing.

SB 1039 4
435.303. 1. A court may refer any individual civil
case or category of civil cases to mediation or any other
nonbinding alternative dispute resolution process, either by
rule or court order.
2. Within thirty days of referral by a court to a
nonbinding alternative dispute resolution process pursuant
to subsection 1 of this section, or such longer time as may
be set by the court, or with leave of the court, the parties
may:
(1) Notify the court that all of the parties have
chosen to pursue an alternative dispute resolution process
different from the nonbinding alternative dispute resolution
process ordered by the court if such choice is evidenced in
a written agreement between the parties;
(2) Notify the court that all of the parties have
agreed to delay such alternative dispute resolution process
until a date certain, which date may be subsequently
modified by the court, to allow for the exchange of
specified information, the identification of representatives
with authority, or any other identified action or event
related to the ability of the parties to participate
effectively in the alternative dispute resolution process; or
(3) If any party, after conferring with all other
parties, concludes that referral to a nonbinding alternative
dispute resolution process has no reasonable chance of
helping the parties to better understand or resolve one or
more of the procedural or substantive issues in the matter
or there is a compelling circumstance for not participating
in the alternative dispute resolution process, the party may
file a motion for relief from the referral, setting forth
the reasons for not participating. Once a motion for relief
has been filed, the alternative dispute resolution process

SB 1039 5
ordered by the court shall not occur until the court has
ruled on the motion. If the court grants the motion, the
matter shall not thereafter be referred by the court to an
alternative dispute resolution process without compelling
circumstances, which shall be set out by the court in any
order referring the matter to an alternative dispute
resolution process.
3. In an action referred to an alternative dispute
resolution process, discovery may proceed as in any other
action before, during, and after the alternative dispute
resolution process is held. The court may stay discovery in
whole or in part during the pendency of an alternative
dispute resolution process in order to promote savings in
time and expense without sacrificing the quality of justice.
4. A neutral who is appointed by the court or
requested by the parties to serve in an alternative dispute
resolution process pursuant to sections 435.300 to 435.312
shall avoid any conflict of interest. Even if the neutral
believes that no disqualifying conflict exists, the neutral
shall:
(1) Make a reasonable inquiry to determine whether
there are any facts that would cause a reasonable person to
believe that the neutral has an actual or potential conflict
of interest before agreeing to serve in a matter;
(2) Disclose to the parties, as soon as practicable,
facts and information relevant to any actual or potential
conflicts of interest that are reasonably known to the
neutral; and
(3) If, after accepting a designation by the parties
or the court, the neutral learns of any previously
undisclosed information that could reasonably suggest a

SB 1039 6
conflict of interest, promptly disclose the information to
the parties.
5. After the neutral's disclosure of a conflict, the
alternative dispute resolution process may proceed if:
(1) All parties agree in writing to service by the
neutral; or
(2) An organization independently administering the
alternative dispute resolution process pursuant to the rules
of procedure that were adopted by a written agreement of the
parties determines under such rules that the neutral may
continue to serve.
6. Any party who believes a court-appointed neutral
has a conflict of interest may request that the neutral
recuse himself or herself if a conflict is disclosed or
otherwise discovered. If the neutral declines, the party
may timely file a motion with the court for disqualification
of the neutral. Failure to file a motion waives that
objection. On its own motion, the court may also review the
choice of a neutral in any alternative dispute resolution
process involving a party that is not represented by counsel
and require a change of neutral if necessary to protect the
rights of the unrepresented party.
435.306. 1. Alternative dispute resolution
communications shall not be admissible as evidence in any
proceeding or subject to discovery, except as otherwise
provided in subsections 2, 3, and 7 of this section.
Exceptions shall be narrowly construed and only the portion
of the communication necessary for the application of the
exception to the general rule of nonadmissibility shall be
admitted.
2. Evidence or information that is otherwise
admissible or subject to discovery, including information

SB 1039 7
that would be available to the public pursuant to sections
610.010 to 610.035, shall not become inadmissible or
protected from discovery solely by reason of its disclosure
or use in an alternative dispute resolution process.
3. A court may admit an alternative dispute resolution
communication upon motion of a party, which motion shall not
reveal the substance of the communication, and following a
hearing, only if the court finds that one or more of the
exceptions in this subsection apply and that the
communication is otherwise relevant and admissible. The
party seeking admission shall ensure that timely notice is
given to the neutral and parties that participated in the
alternative dispute resolution process in which the
alternative dispute resolution communication was made. The
hearing shall be conducted in camera if requested by a party
or if the court determines on its own motion that an in
camera proceeding is necessary to ensure the confidentiality
of the communications that are the subject to the hearing.
The only exceptions to the general rule of nonadmissibility
of alternative dispute resolution communications stated in
subsection 1 of this section are as follows:
(1) The alternative dispute resolution communication
was made in the presence of a mandated reporter and pertains
to abuse or neglect that such mandated reporter is required
by state law or regulation to report;
(2) The alternative dispute resolution communication
is a substantial threat or statement of a plan to inflict
bodily injury capable of causing death or substantial bodily
harm that is reasonably certain to occur;
(3) The alternative dispute resolution communication
is intentionally used to plan a crime, attempt to commit a

SB 1039 8
crime, or to conceal an ongoing crime or ongoing criminal
activity; or
(4) The alternative dispute resolution communication
is necessary to establish or defend against a claim of
professional misconduct or malpractice that is filed against
or on behalf of a participant based on conduct occurring
during the alternative dispute resolution process.
4. The admission of evidence in a proceeding under any
of the exceptions stated in subsection 3 of this section
shall not in itself render the evidence or any other
alternative dispute resolution communication discoverable or
admissible for any other purpose or proceeding.
5. Any participant in an alternative dispute
resolution process has standing to intervene in any
proceeding to object to the admissibility of an alternative
dispute resolution communication made by that participant
during or relating to that alternative dispute resolution
process. A neutral who participated in an alternative
dispute resolution process also has standing to intervene in
any proceeding to object to the admissibility of an
alternative dispute resolution communication made by the
neutral or an agent or employee of a neutral or of an
organization through which the neutral provided the
alternative dispute resolution services for such process,
but the neutral is under no requirement to do so.
6. Except as provided in subsection 7 of this section,
no neutral, agent or employee of that neutral, or agent or
employee of an organization through which the neutral
provided alternative dispute resolution services shall be
subpoenaed or otherwise compelled to disclose any
alternative dispute resolution communication, including any
alternative dispute resolution communication that would

SB 1039 9
otherwise fall within the exceptions identified in
subsection 3 of this section. No neutral who is a licensed
attorney, nor an agent or employee of such neutral or of an
organization through which the neutral provided alternative
dispute resolution services pursuant to sections 435.300 to
435.312, shall be required to disclose any alternative
dispute resolution communication to which a reporting
obligation might otherwise apply under the rules regulating
the professional conduct of attorneys.
7. A neutral, an agent or employee of that neutral, or
an agent or employee of an organization through which the
neutral provided the alternative dispute resolution services
may be subpoenaed in an action to enforce a written
agreement as described in subsection 2 of section 435.309,
but only for the limited purpose of testifying that the
written agreement was signed by the parties in the presence
of the neutral.
8. The court may request that the neutral or the
parties provide the court with progress reports on
alternative dispute resolution processes related to pending
civil actions, except such reports shall be limited to a
statement that the matter has been resolved in its entirety,
partially resolved, or not resolved and whether future dates
for an alternative dispute resolution process are
scheduled. A neutral may also report to the court that a
payment has not been received from one or more parties. A
100 court shall not require the disclosure of alternative
101 dispute resolution communication in any such report.
102 9. The court may order the party or parties seeking
103 admission of an alternative dispute resolution communication
104 to pay the costs and fees of the neutral or other person
105 participating in an alternative dispute resolution process

SB 1039 10
106 who intervenes to contest the disclosure and admission of
107 alternative dispute resolution communication or who responds
108 to a subpoena prohibited by subsection 6 of this section or
109 a subpoena pursuant to subsection 7 of this section.
435.309. 1. Unless the parties have entered into a
written agreement providing for entry into a binding
alternative dispute resolution process, all alternative
dispute resolution processes pursuant to sections 435.300 to
435.312 shall be nonbinding.
2. In order to be binding on the parties, a settlement
agreement that is reached in an alternative dispute
resolution process shall be in a written agreement.
3. Alternative dispute resolution processes included
in consumer contracts for goods or services shall be
independently administered.
435.312. 1. Except as provided in subsection 6 of
this section, sections 435.300 to 435.312 shall apply only
to those alternative dispute resolution processes referred
by rule or court order, or when the parties enter into a
written agreement to resolve their dispute through an
alternative dispute resolution process expressly providing
that sections 435.300 to 435.312 shall apply to such
alternative dispute resolution process.
2. The parties to a dispute may enter into a written
agreement to attempt to resolve their differences through an
alternative dispute resolution process and may agree that
sections 435.300 to 435.312 will apply to such alternative
dispute resolution process before the filing of an action or
after the entry of a judgment, as well as during the
pendency of an action. If the matter resolves and the
parties file a case to present the settlement for approval
by the court, the case shall be exempted from any local rule

SB 1039 11
that refers a class of cases to any alternative dispute
resolution process.
3. Nothing in sections 435.300 to 435.312 shall
preclude any court from referring any individual matter to a
nonbinding alternative dispute resolution process so as to
effectuate the timely, fair, and efficient administration of
justice, subject only to the provisions of subsection 2 of
section 435.303.
4. Nothing in sections 435.300 to 435.312 is intended
to undermine the right of litigants to a jury trial in the
event that a resolution satisfactory to the parties is not
achieved through a nonbinding alternative dispute resolution
process.
5. Nothing in sections 435.300 to 435.312 shall be
deemed to require:
(1) Any party or party representative who appears at
an alternative dispute resolution process in compliance with
a court order to settle all or part of any claim; or
(2) Any party to attend a mediation with counsel if
such party is self-represented.
6. If the court has not referred the case to an
alternative dispute resolution process pursuant to section
435.303 or if the parties do not elect to use sections
435.300 to 435.312, the process shall be regarded as
settlement negotiations and subject to the rules of
confidentiality that generally apply to such negotiations.
If the parties to the dispute have agreed in writing to
submit their dispute to such alternative dispute resolution
process but have not invoked the protections of sections
435.300 to 435.312, no person who serves as a neutral in
such process, nor any agent or employee of that person or of
an organization through which the neutral provided the

SB 1039 12
alternative dispute resolution process, shall be subpoenaed
or otherwise compelled to disclose any matter revealed in
the process of setting up or conducting such alternative
dispute resolution process. All settlement agreements shall
be in writing as described in sections 435.300 to 435.312.
[435.014. 1. If all the parties to a
dispute agree in writing to submit their dispute
to any forum for arbitration, conciliation or
mediation, then no person who serves as
arbitrator, conciliator or mediator, nor any
agent or employee of that person, shall be
subpoenaed or otherwise compelled to disclose
any matter disclosed in the process of setting
up or conducting the arbitration, conciliation
or mediation.
2. Arbitration, conciliation and mediation
proceedings shall be regarded as settlement
negotiations. Any communication relating to the
subject matter of such disputes made during the
resolution process by any participant, mediator,
conciliator, arbitrator or any other person
present at the dispute resolution shall be a
confidential communication. No admission,
representation, statement or other confidential
communication made in setting up or conducting
such proceedings not otherwise discoverable or
obtainable shall be admissible as evidence or
subject to discovery.]
✓